District of Columbia statutes.
7-224

Matching birth and death certificates.

The Registrar is authorized to match birth and death certificates in accordance with written regulations issued by the Mayor to prove beyond a reasonable doubt the fact of death, and to post the facts of death to the appropriate birth certificate. Copies issued from birth certificates marked deceased shall be similarly marked.

Oct. 8, 1981, D.C. Law 4-34, § 25, 28 DCR 3271
1981 Ed., § 6-224.